Oklahoma, session 2026, SB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 72.1 of Title 44, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Defend


the Guard Act”.


B. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Active duty combat” means performing the following services


in the active federal military service of the United States:


a. participation in an armed conflict,


b. performance of a hazardous service in a foreign state,


or

Req. No. 1296 Page 1


c. performance of a duty through an instrumentality of


war; and


2. “Official declaration of war” means an official declaration


of war made by the United States Congress pursuant to Article I,


Section 8, Clause 11 of the United States Constitution.


C. Notwithstanding any other provision of The Oklahoma Military


Code, the Oklahoma National Guard and any member thereof shall not


be released from the state into active duty combat unless the United


States Congress has passed an official declaration of war or has


taken an official action pursuant to Article I, Section 8, Clause 15


of the United States Constitution to explicitly call forth the


Oklahoma National Guard and any member thereof for the enumerated


purposes to expressly execute the laws of the Union, repel an


invasion, or suppress an insurrection. The Governor shall take all


actions necessary to comply with the requirements of this section.


D. Nothing in this act shall limit or prohibit the Governor


from consenting to the deployment of any Oklahoma National Guard


member under the provisions of Title 32, United States Code, defense


support for civil authority missions within the United States or


United States territories.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1296 CAD 12/30/2024 1:59:28 PM



Req. No. 1296 Page 2